Illinois, session 104th, SB1170.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Boat Registration and Safety Act is amended 5by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 45/1-1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 311-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Title and and declaration of intent. This Act 8shall be known and may be cited as the "Boat Registration and 9Safety Act." It is the policy of this State to promote safety 10for persons and property in and connected with the use, 11operation and equipment of vessels and to promote uniformity 12of laws relating thereto.13(Source: P.A. 82-783.)